Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6677XC (2) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.194, subsection 4, paragraph b, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 A licensee may operate a motor vehicle unsupervised over 4 the most direct and accessible route between the licenseeâs 5 residence, school of enrollment, location where the licensee 6 receives competent private instruction or independent private 7 instruction, place of employment, location for farm work or 8 farm-related work if the licensee resides on a farm or is 9 employed for compensation on a farm in this state, and the 10 closest service station, for any of the following purposes, as 11 applicable, provided the driving distance between the point of 12 origin and the destination is no more than twenty-five miles, 13 unless waived pursuant to subsection 6A, and the licensee is in 14 immediate possession of the license card: 15 Sec. 2. Section 321.194, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 16 following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. Accredited nonpublic school distance 18 waiver. A licensee may operate a motor vehicle unsupervised 19 over the most direct and accessible route between the 20 licenseeâs residence and accredited nonpublic school of 21 enrollment regardless of the distance if the licensee receives 22 a distance waiver and carries a copy of the waiver while 23 operating the motor vehicle. 24 a. The parent or guardian of a licensee may apply for a 25 distance waiver by submitting an application to the chief 26 school administrator or superintendent of the licenseeâs 27 accredited nonpublic school. 28 b. The chief school administrator or superintendent of the 29 licenseeâs accredited nonpublic school may approve a distance 30 waiver application and, if approved, shall provide a tangible 31 copy of the waiver to the licensee. 32